Massachusetts, session 194th, S1990.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out line 6 and inserting in place thereof the following:- "(1) In the
case of a single person, twelve thousand nine hundred fifty dollars, or"
SECTION 2. Section 5 of chapter 62 of the general laws is further amended by striking
out lines 7 through 10 and inserting in place thereof the following:- "(2) in the case of a husband
and wife filing a joint return, twenty five thousand nine hundred dollars plus the deductions
allowed under the following provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection (B) of section three of this
chapter, or a person filing as a head of household, nineteen thousand four hundred dollars plus
the deductions allowed under the following provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection (B) of
section three of this chapter."
of 1